Illinois, session 104th, HB1295.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The PFAS Reduction Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5, 10, and 15 and by adding Sections 45, 50, 55, 60, 665, 70, and 75 as follows: 7    (415 ILCS 170/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act, unless otherwise 9specified:10    "Adult mattress" has the meaning given to that term in 16 11CFR 1632.1(a). 12    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 13Agency.14    "Air care product" means any consumer product, including, 15but not limited to, sprays, wicks, powders, and crystals, 16designed for the purpose of masking odors, or freshening, 17cleaning, scenting, or deodorizing the air. To determine 18whether a product is an air freshener, all verbal and visual 19representations regarding product use on the label or 20packaging and in the product's literature and advertising may 21be considered. 22    "Automotive maintenance product" means a chemically 23formulated consumer product labeled to indicate that the   HB1295- 2 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1purpose of the product is to maintain the appearance of a motor 2vehicle, including products for washing, waxing, polishing, 3cleaning, or treating the exterior or interior surfaces of a 4motor vehicle. "Automotive maintenance product" does not 5include automotive paint or paint repair products. 6    "Board" means the Pollution Control Board. 7    "Carpet or rug" means a fabric marketed or intended for 8use as a floor covering. 9    "Class B firefighting foam" means foam designed to 10extinguish flammable liquid fires or prevent the ignition of 11flammable liquids.12    "Cleaning product" means a finished product used primarily 13for domestic, commercial, or institutional cleaning purposes, 14including, but not limited to, to an air care product, 15automotive maintenance product, general cleaning product, or 16polish or floor maintenance product. 17    "Cookware" means durable houseware items used to prepare, 18dispense, or store food, foodstuffs, or beverages. "Cookware" 19includes, but is not limited to, pots, pan, skillets, grills, 20baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls, and cooking 21utensils. 22    "Cosmetics" means articles, excluding soap: 23        (1) intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or 24    sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the 25    human body or any part of the human body for the purpose of 26    cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or   HB1295- 3 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1    altering the appearance; and2        (2) intended for use as a component of any article. 3    "Currently unavoidable use" means a use of PFAS that the 4Board has determined by rule under this Act to be essential for 5health, safety, or the functioning of society and for which 6alternatives are not reasonably available. 7    "Fabric treatment" means a substance applied to fabric to 8give the fabric one or more characteristics, including, but 9not limited to, stain resistance or water resistance. 10    "Fire department" means the duly authorized fire 11protection organization of a unit of local government, a 12Regional Fire Protection Agency, a fire protection district, 13or a volunteer fire department.14    "Food packaging" means a container applied to or providing 15a means to market, protect, handle, deliver, serve, contain, 16or store a food or beverage. "Food packaging" includes:17        (1) a unit package, an intermediate package, and a 18    shipping container;19        (2) unsealed receptacles, such as carrying cases, 20    crates, cups, plates, bowls, pails, rigid foil and other 21    trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags, and tubs; and22        (3) an individually assembled part of a food package, 23    such as any interior or exterior blocking, bracing, 24    cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior strapping, 25    coatings, closures, inks, and labels. 26    "Intentionally added" means PFAS deliberately added during   HB1295- 4 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1the manufacture of a product or reasonably anticipated to be 2present. 3    "Juvenile product" means a product designed or marketed 4for use by infants and children under 12 years of age. 5"Juvenile product" includes, but is not limited to, a baby or 6toddler foam pillow, bassinet, bedside sleeper, booster seat, 7changing pad, child restraint system for use in a motor 8vehicle and aircraft, co-sleeper, crib mattress, highchair, 9highchair pad, infant bouncer, infant carrier, infant seat, 10infant sleep positioner, infant swing, infant travel bed, 11infant walker, nap cot, nursing pad, nursing pillow, play mat, 12playpen, play yard, polyurethane foam mat, pad, or pillow, 13portable foam nap mat, portable infant sleeper, portable 14hook-on chair, soft-sided portable crib, stroller, and toddler 15mattress. "Juvenile product" does not include a children's 16electronic product, including a personal computer, audio and 17video equipment, calculator, wireless phone, game console, 18handheld device incorporating a video screen, or any 19associated peripheral, such as a mouse, keyboard, power supply 20unit, power cord, adult mattress, or an internal component of 21a product that would not come into direct contact with a 22child's skin or mouth during reasonably foreseeable use and 23abuse of the product. 24    "Local government" means a unit of local government or 25other special purpose district that provides firefighting 26services.  HB1295- 5 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1    "Manufacturer" means the person that creates or produces a 2product or whose brand name is affixed to the product. In the 3case of a product imported into the United States, 4"manufacturer" includes the importer or first domestic 5distributor of the product if the person that manufactured or 6assembled the product or whose brand name is affixed to the 7product does not have a presence in the United States. a person 8that manufactures Class B firefighting foam and any agents of 9that person, including an importer, distributor, authorized 10servicer, factory branch, or distributor branch.11    "Medical device" has the meaning given to the term 12"device" under subsection (h) of Section 321 of Title 21 of the 13United States Code. 14    "Menstrual product" means a product used to collect 15menstruation and vaginal discharge, including, but not limited 16to, tampons, pads, sponges, menstruation underwear, disks, and 17menstrual cups, whether disposable or reusable. 18    "Perfluoroalkyl substance or polyfluoroalkyl substance" or 19"PFAS" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals 20containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.21    "Person" means any individual, partnership, association, 22public or private corporation, limited liability company, or 23any other type of legal or commercial entity, including, but 24not limited to, members, managers, partners, directors, or 25officers.26    "Product" means an item manufactured, assembled, packaged,   HB1295- 6 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, including, but 2not limited to, its product components, sold or distributed 3for personal, residential, commercial, or industrial use, 4including for use in making other products. 5    "Product component" means an identifiable component of a 6product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product 7is the manufacturer of the component. 8    "Ski wax" means a lubricant applied to the bottom of snow 9runners, including, but not limited to, skis and snowboards, 10to improve their grip or glide properties. "Ski wax" includes 11related tuning products. 12    "Testing" means calibration testing, conformance testing, 13and fixed system testing.14    "Textile" means an item made, in whole or in part, from a 15natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric. "Textile" 16includes, but is not limited to, leather, cotton, silk, jute, 17hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, and polyester. 18    "Textile furnishings" means textile goods of a type 19customarily used in households and buildings, including, but 20not limited to, draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, 21bedding, towels, and tablecloths. 22    "Upholstered furniture" means an article of furniture that 23is designed to be used for sitting, resting, or reclining and 24that is wholly or partly stuffed or filled with any filling 25material. 26(Source: P.A. 102-290, eff. 8-6-21.)   HB1295- 7 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1    (415 ILCS 170/10)2    Sec. 10. Class B firefighting foam; PFAS.3    (a) Beginning January 1, 2022, a person, local government, 4fire department, or State agency may not use for training or 5testing purposes a Class B firefighting foam containing 6intentionally added PFAS. However, the testing of Class B 7firefighting foam to which PFAS has been intentionally added 8may occur if the person, local government, fire department, or 9State agency has performed all of the following: 10        (1) Evaluate the testing facility for containment, 11    treatment, and disposal measures to prevent uncontrolled 12    release of Class B firefighting foam to the environment. 13    Appropriate containment, treatment, and disposal or 14    storage measures may not include flushing, draining, or 15    otherwise discharging the foam into a storm drain or 16    sanitary sewer.17        (2) Comply with the notification requirements provided 18    in Section 15. 19        (3) Provide training to employees of the possible 20    hazards, protective actions, and a disposal plan. 21    (b) On and after January 1, 2025, a manufacturer of Class B 22firefighting foam may not knowingly manufacture, sell, offer 23for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this 24State a Class B firefighting foam containing intentionally 25added PFAS. Any person who operates a refinery or chemical or   HB1295- 8 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1ethanol plant, a storage and distribution facility, or a tank 2farm or terminal for flammable liquids, or who has a fixed foam 3system in use at a manufacturing facility or warehouse, may 4extend the date of compliance under this subsection to January 51, 2027 if, prior to January 1, 2025, the person determines 6that additional time for compliance is needed and sends notice 7of the determination to the Office of the State Fire Marshal.8    (c) The prohibitions of this Section do not apply to the 9manufacture, sale, or distribution of Class B firefighting 10foam where the inclusion of PFAS chemicals is required or 11authorized under federal law or local building or fire codes, 12including, but not limited to, 14 CFR 139.317, federal 13aviation administration guidance, and the 2016 edition of NFPA 14409 Standard on Aircraft Hangars as amended, or otherwise 15required for a military purpose. However, if applicable 16federal law allows the use of alternative firefighting agents 17that do not contain PFAS chemicals, the restrictions under 18this Section shall apply.19    (d) The prohibitions of this Section do not apply to the 20use of Class B firefighting foam containing PFAS chemicals by 21a fire department while responding to an emergency situation.22    (e) On and after January 1, 2022, a manufacturer of Class B 23firefighting foam must provide notification to the fire 24department prior to the fire department's purchase of Class B 25firefighting foam containing PFAS clearly indicating: 26        (1) that the product contains PFAS that may be   HB1295- 9 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1    hazardous to health or the environment;2        (2) the use of the product is regulated and restricted 3    under this Act; and4        (3) other Class B firefighting foam options may be 5    available for purchase. 6    (f) As used in this Section, "manufacturer" means a person 7that manufactures Class B firefighting foam and any agents of 8that person, including an importer, distributor, authorized 9servicer, factory branch, or distributor branch. 10(Source: P.A. 102-290, eff. 8-6-21.) 11    (415 ILCS 170/15)12    Sec. 15. Notification.13    (a) On and after 30 days after the effective date of this 14Act, a manufacturer of Class B firefighting foam that is 15regulated under this Act must notify, in writing, a person 16that sells the manufacturer's Class B firefighting foam in 17this State of the provisions of this Act.18    (b) Beginning on January 1, 2022, any person, unit of 19local government, fire department, or State agency that 20discharges or releases Class B firefighting foam that contains 21intentionally added PFAS chemicals must notify the Illinois 22Emergency Management Agency within 48 hours of the discharge 23or release. The notification must include:24        (1) the time, date, location, and estimated amount of 25    Class B firefighting foam discharged or released into the   HB1295- 10 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1    environment;2        (2) the purpose or reason of the discharge or release 3    into the environment;4        (3) the containment, treatment, and disposal measures 5    to be taken or used to prevent or minimize the discharge or 6    release of the Class B firefighting foam into the 7    environment; and8        (4) the name of the person, unit of local government, 9    fire department, or State agency, the local incident 10    number, and the Fire Department Identification (FDID) 11    number, if applicable.12    (c) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall, no 13less than annually, report any notifications specified in 14subsection (b) to the Office of the State Fire Marshal.15    (d) As used in this Section, "manufacturer" means a person 16that manufactures Class B firefighting foam and any agents of 17that person, including an importer, distributor, authorized 18servicer, factory branch, or distributor branch. 19(Source: P.A. 102-290, eff. 8-6-21.) 20    (415 ILCS 170/45 new)21    Sec. 45. Information requirement.22    (a) On or before January 1, 2027, a manufacturer of a 23product sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the State 24that contains intentionally added PFAS must submit to the 25Agency information that includes:   HB1295- 11 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1        (1) a brief description of the product, including a 2    universal product code (UPC), stock keeping unit (SKU), or 3    other numeric code assigned to the product; 4        (2) the purpose for which PFAS are used in the 5    product, including in any product components; 6        (3) the amount of each PFAS, identified by its 7    chemical abstracts service registry number, in the 8    product, reported as an exact quantity determined using 9    commercially available analytical methods or as falling 10    within a range approved for reporting purposes by the 11    Board; 12        (4) the name and address of the manufacturer and the 13    name, address, and phone number of a contact person for 14    the manufacturer; and 15        (5) any additional information requested by the agency 16    as necessary to implement the requirements of this 17    Section. 18    (b) With the approval of the Agency, a manufacturer may 19supply the information required in subsection (a) for a 20category or type of product rather than for each individual 21product. 22    (c) A manufacturer must submit the information required 23under this Section whenever a new product that contains 24intentionally added PFAS is sold, offered for sale, or 25distributed in the State and update and revise the information 26whenever there is a significant change in the information or   HB1295- 12 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1when requested to do so by the Agency. 2    (d) A person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute 3for sale in the State a product containing intentionally added 4PFAS if the manufacturer has failed to provide the information 5required under this Section and the person has received 6notification under Section 50.  7    (415 ILCS 170/50 new)8    Sec. 50. Information requirement waivers and extensions.9    (a) The Agency may waive all or part of the information 10requirement under Section 45 if the Agency determines that 11substantially equivalent information is already publicly 12available. The Agency may grant a waiver under this subsection 13to a manufacturer or a group of manufacturers for multiple 14products or a product category. 15    (b) The Agency may enter into an agreement with one or more 16states or political subdivisions of a state to collect 17information and may accept information to a shared system as 18meeting the information requirement under Section 45. 19    (c) The Agency may extend the deadline for submission by a 20manufacturer of the information required under Section 45 if 21the Agency determines that more time is needed by the 22manufacturer to comply with the submission requirement.  23    (415 ILCS 170/55 new)24    Sec. 55. Testing required; certificate of compliance.  HB1295- 13 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1    (a) If the Board has reason to believe that a product 2contains intentionally added PFAS and the product is being 3offered for sale in the State, the Board may direct the 4manufacturer of the product to, within 30 days, provide the 5Board with testing results that demonstrate the amount of each 6of the PFAS, identified by its chemical abstracts service 7registry number, in the product, reported as an exact quantity 8determined using commercially available analytical methods or 9as falling within a range approved for reporting purposes by 10the Board. 11    (b) If testing demonstrates that the product does not 12contain intentionally added PFAS, the manufacturer must 13provide the Board with a certificate attesting that the 14product does not contain intentionally added PFAS, including 15testing results and any other relevant information. 16    (c) If testing demonstrates that the product contains 17intentionally added PFAS, the manufacturer must provide the 18Board with the testing results and the information required 19under Section 45. 20    (d) A manufacturer must notify a person who sells or 21offers for sale the manufacturer's product prohibited under 22Section 45 or 60 that the sale of the product is prohibited in 23this State and provide the Board with a list of the names and 24addresses of those notified. 25    (e) The Board may notify a person who sells or offers for 26sale a product prohibited under Section 60 that the sale of   HB1295- 14 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1that product is prohibited in this State.  2    (415 ILCS 170/60 new)3    Sec. 60. Prohibitions.4    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a person may not sell, 5offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this State the 6following products if the product contains intentionally added 7PFAS: 8        (1) carpets or rugs; 9        (2) cleaning products; 10        (3) cookware; 11        (4) cosmetics; 12        (5) dental floss; 13        (6) fabric treatments; 14        (7) juvenile products; 15        (8) menstrual products; 16        (9) intimate apparel; 17        (10) textile furnishings; 18        (11) ski wax; 19        (12) upholstered furniture; 20        (13) food packaging; or 21        (14) compostable products. 22    (b) The Board may, by rule, identify additional products 23by category or use that may not be sold, offered for sale, or 24distributed for sale in this State if they contain 25intentionally added PFAS and designate effective dates for the   HB1295- 15 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1prohibitions. A prohibition adopted under this subsection must 2be effective no earlier than January 1, 2026, and no later than 3January 1, 2033. The Board must prioritize the prohibition of 4the sale of product categories that, in the Board's judgment, 5are most likely to contaminate or harm the State's environment 6and natural resources if they contain intentionally added 7PFAS. 8    (c) Beginning January 1, 2033, a person may not sell, 9offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this State any 10product that contains intentionally added PFAS, unless the 11Board has determined, by rule, that the use of the PFAS in the 12product is currently unavoidable. The Board may specify 13specific products or product categories for which the Board 14has determined the use of PFAS is a currently unavoidable use. 15The Board may not determine that the use of PFAS in a product 16is a currently unavoidable use if the product is listed in 17subsection (a). 18    (d) The Board may not take action under subsection (b) or 19(c) with respect to a pesticide, fertilizer, agricultural 20liming material, plant amendment, or soil amendment unless the 21Department of Agriculture approves the action.  22    (415 ILCS 170/65 new)23    Sec. 65. Fees. The Agency may establish, by rule, a fee 24payable by a manufacturer to the Agency upon submission of the 25information required under Section 45 to cover the Agency's   HB1295- 16 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1reasonable costs to implement Section 45. Fees collected under 2this Section must be deposited into an account in the 3Environmental Protection Trust Fund. 4    (415 ILCS 170/70 new)5    Sec. 70. Enforcement.6    (a) The Agency may coordinate with the Board, the 7Department of Agriculture, and the Department of Public Health 8in enforcing this amendatory Act of the 104th General 9Assembly. 10    (b) When requested by the Agency, a person must furnish to 11the Agency any information that the person may have or may 12reasonably obtain that is relevant to show compliance with 13this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  14    (415 ILCS 170/75 new)15    Sec. 75. Exemptions.16    (a) The changes to this Act by this amendatory Act of the 17104th General Assembly do not apply to: 18        (1) a product for which federal law governs the 19    presence of PFAS in the product in a manner that preempts 20    State authority; 21        (2) a product regulated under Sections 10 through 40; 22    or 23        (3) the sale or resale of a used product. 24    (b) Sections 55 and 60 do not apply to a prosthetic or   HB1295- 17 -LRB104 07312 BDA 17351 b1orthotic device or to any product that is a medical device or 2drug or that is otherwise used in a medical setting or in 3medical applications regulated by the United States Food and 4Drug administration.